South Dakota, session 2026, HB1325.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. That a NEW SECTION be added to chapter 13-53:
Neither the Board of Regents nor any institution under its control may require that
a postsecondary student live in on-campus housing, or purchase a meal plan or meal
voucher, beyond the student's first year of attendance at an institution.
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.